California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
At a sale conducted pursuant to this article the board, or its authorized agent, shall sell the property, in accordance with all applicable provisions of law and the notice specified in Section 50129, and the board shall deliver to the purchaser a bill of sale for the personal property and a deed for any real property sold. The bill of sale or deed vests title in the purchaser. The unsold portion of any property seized may be left at the place of sale at the risk of the fee payer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1442, Sec. 6.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

50131.

If, after a sale conducted pursuant to this article, the money received exceeds the amount of all fees, interest, penalties, and costs due the state from the fee payer, the board shall return the excess to the fee payer and obtain the fee payer’s receipt. If any persons having an interest in or lien upon the property files with the board prior to the sale notice of the person’s interest, the board shall withhold any excess pending a determination of the rights of the respective parties to the excess moneys by a court of competent jurisdiction. If the receipt
 of the fee payer is not available, the board shall deposit the excess moneys with the Controller, as trustee for the owner, subject to the order of the fee payer, and the fee payer’s heirs, successors, or assigns.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 860, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Miscellaneous [50132. - 50138.9.]

50132.

If any fee payer is delinquent in the payment of any obligation imposed by this part, or if any determination has been made against a fee payer which remains unpaid, the board may, not later than three years after the payment becomes delinquent, or the last recording or filing of a notice of state tax lien under Section 7171 of the Government Code, give notice thereof, personally or by first-class mail, to all persons, including any officer or department of the state or any political subdivision or agency of the state, having in their possession or under their control any credits or other personal property belonging to the
 fee payer, or owing any debts to the fee payer. In the case of any state officer, department, or agency, the notice shall be given to the officer, department, or agency prior to the time it presents the claim of the delinquent fee payer to the Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1366, Sec. 64.   Effective September 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

50133.

After receiving the notice specified in Section 50132, the persons so notified shall not transfer or make any other disposition of the credits, other personal property, or debts in their possession or under their control at the time they receive the notice until the board consents to a transfer or disposition or until 60 days after the receipt of the notice, whichever occurs first.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1442, Sec. 6.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

50134.

All persons notified pursuant to Section 50132 shall immediately, after receipt of the notice, advise the board of all credits, other personal property, or debts in their possession, under their control, or owing by them. If the notice seeks to prevent the transfer or other disposition of a deposit in a bank or other credits or personal property in the possession or under the control of a bank, the notice, to be effective, shall state the amount, interest, and penalty due from the person and shall be delivered or mailed to the branch or office of the bank at which the deposit is carried or at which the credits or personal
 property are held. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, with respect to a deposit in a bank or other credits or personal property in the possession or under the control of a bank, the notice shall only be effective with respect to an amount not in excess of the amount, interest, and penalty due from the person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1366, Sec. 65.   Effective September 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

50135.

If, during the effective period of the notice to withhold, given pursuant to Section 50132, any person so notified makes any transfer or disposition of the property or debts required to be withheld, to the extent of the value of the property or the amount of the debts thus transferred or paid, the person is liable to the state for any indebtedness due under this part from the fee payer with respect to whose obligation the notice was given, if solely because of that transfer or disposition, the state is unable to recover the indebtedness of the person with respect to whose obligation the notice was given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1442, Sec. 6.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

50136.

(a) The department may, by notice of levy, served personally, by first-class mail, or by electronic transmission or other electronic technology, require all persons having in their possession, or under their control, any payments, credits other than payments, or other personal property belonging to a feepayer or other person liable for any amount under this part to withhold from these credits or other personal property the amount of any fee, interest, or penalties due from the feepayer or other person, or the amount of any liability incurred under this part, and to transmit the amount withheld to the department at the time it may designate. The notice of levy shall have the same effect as a levy pursuant to a writ of execution except for the continuing effect of the levy, as provided in
 subdivision (b).

(b) The person served shall continue to withhold pursuant to the notice of levy until the amount specified in the notice, including accrued interest, has been paid in full, until the notice is withdrawn, or until one year from the date the notice is received, whichever occurs first.

(c) The amount required to be withheld is the lesser of the following:

(1) The amount due stated on the notice.

(2) The sum of both of the following:

(A) The amount of the payments, credits other than payments, or personal property described above and under the person’s possession or control when the notice of levy is served on the person.

(B) The amount of each payment that becomes due following service of the notice of levy on the person and prior to the expiration of the levy.

(d) For the purposes of this section, the term “payments” does not include earnings as that term is defined in subdivision (a) of Section 706.011 of the Code of Civil Procedure or funds in a deposit account as defined in paragraph (29) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code. The term “payments” does include any of the following:

(1) Payments due for services of independent contractors, dividends, rents, royalties, residuals, patent rights, or mineral or other natural rights.

(2) Payments or credits due or becoming due periodically as a result of an enforceable obligation to the feepayer or other person liable for the fee.

(3) Any other payments or credits due or becoming due the feepayer or other person liable as the result of written or oral contracts for services or sales whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonus, or otherwise.

(e) In the case of a financial institution, to be effective, the notice shall state the amount due from the feepayer and shall be delivered, mailed, or served by electronic transmission or other electronic technology to the branch or office of the financial institution where the credits or other property is held, unless another branch or office is designated by the financial institution to receive the notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 93.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

50136.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Article 7 (commencing with Section 706.151) of Chapter 5 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, if the board determines upon receiving information from a feepayer or other person liable for any amount under this part that the person’s employer withheld earnings for taxes pursuant to Section 50136 and failed to remit the withheld earnings to the board, the employer shall be liable for the amount not remitted. The board’s determination shall be based on payroll documents or other substantiating evidence
 furnished by the person liable for the tax.

(b) Upon its determination, the board shall mail notice to the employer at its last known address that upon failure to remit the withheld earnings to the board within 15 days of the date of its notice to the employer, the employer shall be liable for that amount which was withheld and not remitted.

(c) If the employer fails to remit the amount withheld to the board upon notice, that amount for which the employer is liable shall be determined, collected, and paid as though it were a tax deficiency. The amount may be assessed at any time prior to seven years from the first day that the unremitted amount, in the aggregate, was first withheld. Interest shall accrue on that amount from the first day that the unremitted amount, in the aggregate, was first withheld.

(d) When the
 determination against the employer is final and due and payable, the person’s account shall be immediately credited with an amount equal to that determined amount as though it were a payment received by the board on the first date that the unremitted amount, in the aggregate, was first withheld by the employer.

(e) Collection against the person liable for the tax is stayed for both the following amount and period:

(1) An amount equal to the amount determined by the board under subdivision (a).

(2) The earlier of the time the credit is applied to the person’s account pursuant to subdivision (d) or the determination against the employer is withdrawn or revised and the person is notified by the board thereof.

(f) If under this section an amount that was
 withheld and not remitted to the board is final and due and payable by the employer and credited to the person’s account, this remedy shall be the exclusive remedy for the person to recover that amount from the employer.

(g) This section shall apply to determinations made by the board on or after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 82.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

50137.

The remedies of the state provided for in this chapter are cumulative, and no action taken by the board or by the Attorney General constitutes an election by the state or any of its officers to pursue any remedy to the exclusion of any other remedy for which provision is made in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1442, Sec. 6.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

50138.

(a) The amounts required to be paid by any person under this part, together with any penalties, shall be satisfied first in any of the following cases:

(1) Whenever the person is insolvent.

(2) Whenever the person makes a voluntary assignment of the person’s assets. 

(3) Whenever the estate of the person in the hands of executors, administrators, or heirs is insufficient to pay all the debts due from the
 deceased.

(4) Whenever the estate and effects of an absconding, concealed, or absent person required to pay any amount under this part are levied upon by process of law.

(b) This section does not give the state a preference over a lien or security interest which was recorded or perfected prior to the time when the state records or files its lien, as provided in Section 7171 of the Government Code.

(c) The preference given to the state by this section is subordinate to the preferences given to claims for personal services made pursuant to Sections 1204 and 1206 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1442, Sec. 6.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

50138.5.

The board shall not be subject to subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 16307 of the Corporations Code unless, at the time of application for or issuance of a permit, license, or registration number under this part, the applicant furnishes to the board a written partnership agreement that provides that all business assets shall be held in the name of the partnership.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

50138.6.

(a) The board may, in its discretion, enter into a written installment payment agreement with a person for the payment of any fees due, together with interest thereon and any applicable penalties, in installments over an agreed period. With mutual consent, the board and the fee payer may alter or modify the agreement.

(b) Upon failure of a person to fully comply with the terms of an installment payment agreement with the board, the board may terminate the agreement by
 mailing a notice of termination to the person. The notice shall include an explanation of the basis for the termination and inform the person of his or her right to request an administrative review of the termination. Fifteen days after the mailing of the notice, the installment payment agreement shall be void, and the total amount of the fees, interest, and penalties due shall be immediately payable.

(c) The board shall establish procedures for an administrative review for persons requesting that review whose installment payment agreements are terminated under subdivision (b). The collection of fees, interest, and penalties that are the subject of the terminated installment payment agreement may not be stayed during this administrative review process.

(d) Subdivision (b) shall not apply to any case where the board finds collection of the fee to be in jeopardy. 

(e) Except in the case of fraud, if an installment payment agreement is entered into within 45 days from the date on which the board’s notice of determination or redetermination becomes final, and the person complies with the terms of the installment payment agreement, the board shall relieve the penalty imposed pursuant to Section 50119.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 83.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

50138.7.

The board, beginning no later than January 1, 2001, shall provide each taxpayer who has an installment payment agreement in effect under Section 50138.6 an annual statement setting forth the initial balance at the beginning of the year, the payments made during the year, and the remaining balance as of the end of the year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 84.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

50138.8.

(a) A collection cost recovery fee shall be imposed on any person that fails to pay an amount of fee, interest, penalty, or other amount due and payable under this part. The collection cost recovery fee shall be in an amount less than or equal to the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration’s costs for collection, as reasonably determined by the
 California Department of Tax and Fee Administration. The collection cost recovery fee shall be imposed only if the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration has mailed its demand notice, to that person for payment, that advises that continued failure to pay the amount due may result in collection action, including the imposition of a collection cost recovery fee.

(b) Interest shall not accrue with respect to the collection cost recovery fee provided by this section.

(c) The collection cost recovery fee imposed pursuant to this section shall be collected in the same manner as the collection of any other fee imposed by this part.

(d) (1) If the
 California Department of Tax and Fee Administration finds that a person’s failure to pay any amount under this part is due to reasonable cause and circumstances beyond the person’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect, the person shall be relieved of the collection cost recovery fee provided by this section.

(2) Any person seeking to be relieved of the collection cost recovery fee shall file with the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which the person bases the claim for relief.

(e) Subdivision (a)
 shall be operative with respect to a demand notice for payment which is mailed on or after January 1, 2011.

(f) Collection cost recovery fee revenues shall be deposited in the same manner as revenues derived from any other fee imposed by this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 167.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

50138.9.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 706.071, 706.073, 706.080, 706.101, and 706.105 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may serve earnings withholding orders for taxes and any other notice or document required to be served or provided in connection with an earnings withholding order for taxes according to Article 4 (commencing with Section 706.070) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure to government and private employers by electronic transmission or other electronic technology.

(b) Upon consent of the employer, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may
 provide service by electronic transmission or other electronic technology under this section.

(c) Notwithstanding Sections 706.071, 706.073, 706.080, 706.101, 706.125, and 706.126 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may receive the employer’s return, as described in Section 706.126 of the Code of Civil Procedure, by electronic transmission or other electronic technology.

(d) This section shall apply in the same manner and with the same force and effect and to the full extent as if this section had been incorporated in full into Article 4 (commencing with Section 706.070) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(e) This
 section shall apply to notices served or provided on or after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 511, Sec. 33.   (SB 889)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Overpayments and Refunds [50139. - 50151.]



  ARTICLE 1. Claim for Refund [50139. - 50142.2.]

50139.

(a) If the department determines that any amount of fee, interest, or penalty has been paid more than once or has been erroneously or illegally collected or computed, the department shall set forth that fact in its records and certify the amount collected in excess of what was legally due and the person from whom it was collected or by whom it was paid. The excess amount collected or paid shall be credited on any amounts then due from the person from whom the excess amount was collected or by whom it was paid under this part, and the balance shall be refunded to the person, or the person’s successors, administrators, or executors.

(b) Any determination by the department that is in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000)
 shall be available as a public record for at least 10 days after the effective date of that determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 94.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

50139.5.

When an amount represented by a person who is a feepayer under this part to a customer as constituting reimbursement for fees due under this part is computed upon an amount that is not subject to that fee or is in excess of that fee amount due and is actually paid by the customer to the person, the amount so paid shall be returned by the person to the customer upon notification by the State Board of Equalization or by the customer that the excess has been ascertained. If the person fails or refuses to do so, the amount so paid, if knowingly or mistakenly
 computed by the person upon an amount that is not subject to the fee or is in excess of the fee due, shall be remitted by that person to this state. Those amounts remitted to the state shall be credited by the board on any amounts due and payable under this part on the same activity from the person by whom it was paid to this state and the balance, if any, shall constitute an obligation due from the person to this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1087, Sec. 62.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

50140.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the board shall not approve a refund three years after the due date of the payment for the period for which the overpayment was made, or, with respect to determinations made under Article 2 (commencing with Section 50113) of Chapter 3, after six months from the date the determinations have become final, or after six months from the date of overpayment, whichever period expires later, unless a claim therefor is filed with the board within that period. The board shall not approve a credit after
 the expiration of that period, unless a claim for credit is filed with the board within that period.

(b) A refund may be approved by the board for any period for which a waiver is given under Section 50113.2 if a claim is filed with the board before the expiration of the period agreed upon.

(c) Every claim for refund or credit shall be in writing and shall state the specific grounds upon which the claim is founded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 543, Sec. 50.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

50140.1.

(a) The limitation period specified in Section 50140 shall be suspended during any period of a person’s life that the person is financially disabled.

(b) (1) For purposes of subdivision (a), a person is financially disabled if the person is unable to manage his or her financial affairs by reason of medically determinable physical or mental impairment of the person which can be expected to result in death or which has lasted or can be expected to last
 for a continuous period of not less than 12 months. A person shall not be considered to have an impairment unless proof of the existence thereof is furnished in the form and manner as the board may require.

(2) A person shall not be treated as financially disabled during any period that the person’s spouse or any other person is authorized to act on behalf of the person in financial matters.

(c) This section applies to a period of disability commencing before, on, or after the effective date of the act adding this section, but does not apply to any claim for refund that (without regard to this section) is barred by the operation or rule of law, including res judicata, as of the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 85.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

50140.2.

Notwithstanding Section 50140, a refund of an overpayment of any fee, penalty, or interest collected by the board by means of levy, through the use of liens, or by other enforcement procedures, shall be approved if a claim for a refund is filed within three years of the date of an overpayment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 364, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

50140.3.

(a) A claim for refund that is otherwise valid under Section 50140 that is made in the case in which the amount of fee determined has not been paid in full shall be deemed to be a timely filed claim for refund with respect to all subsequent payments applied to that determination.

(b) For purposes of this section, “amount of fee determined” means an amount of fee, interest, or penalty, with
 respect to a single determination made under Article 2 (commencing with Section 50113) or Article 4 (commencing with Section 50120.1) of Chapter 3.

(c) This section shall apply to all claims for refund on or after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 98, Sec. 10.   (AB 1856)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

50141.

The failure of a person to file a claim within the time prescribed in this article constitutes a waiver of all demands against the state on account of the overpayment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1442, Sec. 6.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

50142.

Within 30 days after disallowing any claim, in whole or in part, the board shall serve written notice of its action on the claimant pursuant to Section 50113.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1442, Sec. 6.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

50142.1.

Interest shall be computed, allowed, and paid upon any overpayment of any amount of fee at the modified adjusted rate per month established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the 26th day of the calendar month following the period during which the overpayment was made. In addition, a refund or credit shall be made of any interest imposed upon the claimant with respect to the amount being refunded or credited.

The interest shall be paid as follows:

(a) In the case of a refund, to the 25th day of the calendar month following the date upon which the claimant, if he or she has not already filed a claim, is notified by the board that a claim may be filed or the date upon which the claim is approved by the board, whichever date is earlier.

(b) In the case of a credit, to the same date as that to which interest is computed on the fee or amount against which the credit is applied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 620, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

50142.2.

(a) If the board determines that any overpayment has been made intentionally or by reason of carelessness, it shall not allow any interest thereon.

(b) If any person who has filed a claim for refund requests the board to defer action on the claim, the board, as a condition to deferring action, may require the claimant to waive interest for the period during which the person requests the board to defer action on the claim.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 420, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Suit for Refund [50143. - 50149.]

50143.

No injunction or writ of mandate or other legal or equitable process shall issue in any suit, action, or proceeding in any court against this state or against any office of the state to prevent or enjoin the collection of any fee sought to be collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1442, Sec. 6.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

50144.

No suit or proceeding shall be maintained in any court for the recovery of any amount alleged to have been erroneously or illegally assessed or collected unless a claim for refund or credit has been filed in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1442, Sec. 6.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

50145.

Within 90 days after the mailing of the notice of the board’s action upon a claim for refund or credit, the claimant may bring an action against the board, on the grounds set forth in the claim, in a court of competent jurisdiction in the County of Sacramento for the recovery of the whole, or any part of, the amount with respect to which the claim has been disallowed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 637.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

50146.

If the board fails to mail a notice of action on a claim within six months after the claim is filed, the claimant may, prior to the mailing of notice by the board, consider the claim disallowed and may bring an action against the board on the grounds set forth in the claim for the recovery of the whole, or any part of, the amount claimed as an overpayment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1442, Sec. 6.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

50147.

A person’s failure to bring suit or action within the time specified in this article constitutes a waiver of all demands against the state on account of any alleged overpayments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1442, Sec. 6.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

50148.

If a judgment made pursuant to Section 50145 is rendered for the plaintiff, the amount of the judgment shall first be credited on any fees due from the plaintiff, and the balance shall be refunded to the plaintiff.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1442, Sec. 6.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

50148.1.

In any judgment, interest shall be allowed at the modified adjusted rate per annum established pursuant to Section 6591.5, upon the amount found to have been illegally collected from the date of payment of the amount to the date of allowance of credit on account of the judgment, or to a date preceding the date of the refund warrant by not more than 30 days, the date to be determined by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1366, Sec. 70.   Effective September 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

50149.

(a) A judgment made pursuant to Section 50145 shall not be rendered in favor of the plaintiff in any action brought against the board to recover any fee paid when the action is brought by or in the name of an assignee of the fee payer paying the tax or by any person other than the person who has paid the fee. 

(b) For purposes of this section, “assignee” does not include a person who has acquired the business of the fee payer which gave rise to the fees and who is thereby a successor in interest to the fee payer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1442, Sec. 6.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Recovery of Erroneous Refunds [50150. - 50150.5.]

50150.

(a) The Controller may recover any refund or part thereof that is erroneously made, and any credit or part thereof that is erroneously allowed, in an action brought in a court of competent jurisdiction in the County of Sacramento in the name of the people of the State of California.

(b) As an alternative to subdivision (a), the board may recover any refund or part thereof that is erroneously made, and any credit or part thereof that is erroneously allowed. In recovering
 any erroneous refund or credit, the board may, in its discretion, issue a deficiency determination in accordance with Article 2 (commencing with Section 50113) or Article 4 (commencing with Section 50120.1) of Chapter 3. Except in the case of fraud, the deficiency determination shall be made by the board within three years from the date of the Controller’s warrant or date of credit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 609, Sec. 48.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

50150.1.

In any action brought pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 50150, the court may, with the consent of the Attorney General, order a change in the place of trial.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 609, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

50150.2.

The Attorney General shall prosecute any action brought pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 50150, and the provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure relating to service of summons, pleadings, proof, trials, and appeals shall apply to the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 609, Sec. 50.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

50150.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, if the department finds that neither the person liable for payment of fees nor any party related to that person has in any way caused an erroneous refund for which an action for recovery is provided under Section 50150, no interest shall be imposed on the amount of that erroneous refund until 30 days after the date on which the department serves a notice of determination for repayment of the erroneous refund to the person. The act of filing a claim for refund shall not be considered as causing the erroneous refund.

(b) This section shall be operative for any action for recovery under Section 50150 on or after January 1, 2000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 110.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Cancellations [50151. - 50151.]

50151.

(a) If any amount has been illegally determined, the department shall certify the amount determined to be in excess of the amount legally due and the person against whom the determination was made and authorize the cancellation of the amount upon the records of the department.

(b) Any determination by the department that is in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) shall be available as a public record for at least 10 days after the effective date of that determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 95.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Administration [50152. - 50156.18.]



  ARTICLE 1. Administration [50152. - 50155.6.4.]

50152.

The board shall enforce this part and may adopt, and enforce rules and regulations relating to the administration and enforcement of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1442, Sec. 6.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

50153.

The board may examine the books and records of any feepayer, or the books and records of any person who is not a feepayer but operates an underground storage tank in a manner that may result in a fee liability being assessed against a feepayer, as it may determine to be necessary in carrying out this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1223, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

50154.

The board may employ accountants, auditors, investigators, and other expert and clerical assistance necessary to enforce its powers and perform its duties under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1442, Sec. 6.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

50155.

A certificate by the board or an employee of the board stating that a notice required by this part was given by mailing or personal service is prima facie evidence in any administrative or judicial proceeding of the fact and regularity of the mailing or personal service in accordance with any requirement of this part for the giving of a notice. Unless otherwise specifically required, any notice provided by this part to be mailed or served may be given either by mailing or by personal service in the manner provided for giving notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1442, Sec. 6.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

50155.5.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, any person who is engaged in the business of preparing, or providing services in connection with the preparation of, returns under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 50109), or any person who for compensation prepares any such return for any other person, and who knowingly or recklessly does either of the following, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned no more than one year, or both, together with
 the costs of prosecution:

(1) Discloses any information furnished to him or her for, or in connection with, the preparation of the return.

(2) Uses that information for any purpose other than to prepare, or assist in preparing, the return.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to disclosure of information if that disclosure is made pursuant to the person’s consent or pursuant to a subpoena, court order, or other compulsory legal process.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 86.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

50155.6.

(a) The board shall determine which feepayer’s accounts are eligible for the managed audit program in a manner that is consistent with the efficient use of its auditing resources and the maximum effectiveness of the program.

(b) A feepayer is not required to participate in the managed audit program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 105, Sec. 46.   (AB 2009)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

50155.6.1.

A feepayer’s account is eligible for the managed audit program only if the feepayer meets all of the following criteria:

(a) The feepayer’s business or activities involve few or no statutory exemptions.

(b) The feepayer’s business or activities involve a single or small number of clearly defined taxability or liability issues.

(c) The feepayer is subject to the fee imposed pursuant to Section 25299.41 of the Health and Safety Code and agrees to participate in the managed audit program.

(d) The feepayer has the resources to comply with the managed audit instructions provided by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 105, Sec. 47.   (AB 2009)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

50155.6.2.

(a) If the board selects a feepayer’s account for a managed audit, all of the following apply:

(1) The board shall identify all of the following:

(A) The audit period covered by the managed audit.

(B) The types of transactions or activities covered by the managed
 audit.

(C) The specific procedures that the feepayer is to follow in determining any liability.

(D) The records to be reviewed by the feepayer.

(E) The manner in which the types of transactions or activities are to be scheduled for review.

(F) The time period for completion of the managed audit.

(G) The time period for the payment of the liability and interest.

(H) Any other criteria that the board may require for completion of the managed audit.

(2) The feepayer shall:

(A) Examine its books and
 records to determine if it has any unreported liability for the audit period.

(B) Make available to the board for verification all computations and books and records examined pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(b) The information provided by the feepayer pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) is the same information that is required for the completion of any other audit that the board may conduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 105, Sec. 48.   (AB 2009)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

50155.6.3.

Nothing in this article limits the board’s authority to examine the books and records of a feepayer under Section 50153.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 105, Sec. 49.   (AB 2009)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

50155.6.4.

Upon completion of the managed audit and verification by the board, interest on any unpaid liability shall be computed at one-half the rate that would otherwise be imposed for liabilities covered by the audit period. Payment of the liabilities and interest shall be made within the time period specified by the board. If the requirements for the managed audit are not satisfied, the board may proceed to examine the records of the feepayer in a manner to be determined by the board